test/src/morphology/Pron-Pers_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Personal pronoun 1 - мунн:
    мунн+Pron+Pers+Sg+Nom: мунн
    мунн+Pron+Pers+Sg+Gen: мун
    мунн+Pron+Pers+Sg+Acc: мун
    мунн+Pron+Pers+Sg+Ill: [мыннӭ,муннӭ]
    мунн+Pron+Pers+Sg+Loc: [мунэсьт,муст]
    мунн+Pron+Pers+Sg+Com: мунэнҍ
    мунн+Pron+Pers+Sg+Abe: мунха
    мунн+Pron+Pers+Sg+Ess: муннэнҍ
    #Par?? see field notes; this form perhaps exists
    мунн+Pron+Pers+Pl+Nom: мыйй
    мунн+Pron+Pers+Pl+Gen: мӣн
    мунн+Pron+Pers+Pl+Acc: мӣнэтҍ
    мунн+Pron+Pers+Pl+Ill: мыйе
    мунн+Pron+Pers+Pl+Loc: мӣнэнҍ
    мунн+Pron+Pers+Pl+Com: мӣнэгуэйм
    мунн+Pron+Pers+Pl+Abe: мӣнэха
    #Pl+Ess?? see Kuruč and Šaršina; I do not believe this form occurs in real texts

  Personal pronoun 2 - то̄нн:
    то̄нн+Pron+Pers+Sg+Nom: то̄нн
    то̄нн+Pron+Pers+Sg+Gen: то̄н
    то̄нн+Pron+Pers+Sg+Acc: то̄н
    то̄нн+Pron+Pers+Sg+Ill: тоннӭ
    то̄нн+Pron+Pers+Sg+Loc: [то̄нэсьт,тост]
    то̄нн+Pron+Pers+Sg+Com: то̄нэнҍ
    то̄нн+Pron+Pers+Sg+Abe: то̄нха
    то̄нн+Pron+Pers+Sg+Ess: то̄ннэнҍ
    то̄нн+Pron+Pers+Pl+Nom: тыйй
    то̄нн+Pron+Pers+Pl+Gen: тӣн
    то̄нн+Pron+Pers+Pl+Acc: тӣнэтҍ
    то̄нн+Pron+Pers+Pl+Ill: тыйе
    то̄нн+Pron+Pers+Pl+Loc: тӣнэнҍ
    то̄нн+Pron+Pers+Pl+Com: тӣнэгуэйм
    то̄нн+Pron+Pers+Pl+Abe: тӣнэха

  Personal pronoun 3 - со̄нн:
    со̄нн+Pron+Pers+Sg+Nom: со̄нн
    со̄нн+Pron+Pers+Sg+Gen: со̄н
    со̄нн+Pron+Pers+Sg+Acc: со̄н
    со̄нн+Pron+Pers+Sg+Ill: соннӭ
    со̄нн+Pron+Pers+Sg+Loc: [со̄нэсьт,сост]
    со̄нн+Pron+Pers+Sg+Com: со̄нэнҍ
    со̄нн+Pron+Pers+Sg+Abe: со̄нха
    со̄нн+Pron+Pers+Sg+Ess: со̄ннэнҍ
    со̄нн+Pron+Pers+Pl+Nom: сыйй
    со̄нн+Pron+Pers+Pl+Gen: сӣн
    со̄нн+Pron+Pers+Pl+Acc: сӣнэтҍ
    со̄нн+Pron+Pers+Pl+Ill: сыйе
    со̄нн+Pron+Pers+Pl+Abe: сӣнэха
    со̄нн+Pron+Pers+Pl+Loc: сӣнэнҍ
    со̄нн+Pron+Pers+Pl+Com: сӣнэгуэйм
    со̄нн+Pron+Pers+Pl+Abe: сӣнэха

#  Personal pronoun Q - ке̄:
#    ке̄+Pron+Pers+Sg+Nom: ке̄
#    ке̄+Pron+Pers+Sg+Gen: ке̄нн
#    ке̄+Pron+Pers+Sg+Acc: ке̄нн
#    ке̄+Pron+Pers+Sg+Ill: ке̄з
#    ке̄+Pron+Pers+Sg+Loc: ке̄сът
#    ке̄+Pron+Pers+Sg+Com: ке̄йн
#    ке̄+Pron+Pers+Sg+Abe: ке̄ннха
#    ке̄+Pron+Pers+Sg+Ess: кейненҍ
#    ке̄#Par?? see field notes
#    ке̄+Pron+Pers+Pl+Nom: ке̄гк
#    ке̄+Pron+Pers+Pl+Gen: ке̄йт
#    ке̄+Pron+Pers+Pl+Acc: ке̄йт
#    ке̄+Pron+Pers+Pl+Ill: ке̄йт
#    ке̄+Pron+Pers+Pl+Loc: ке̄йн
#    ке̄+Pron+Pers+Pl+Com: ке̄йтгуэйм
#    ке̄+Pron+Pers+Pl+Abe: ке̄йтха
#    ке̄ #Pl+Ess?? see Kuruč
